New York, session 2025-2026, S9462.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 1 and subdivision 8 of section 2 11-0913 of the environmental conservation law, paragraph a of subdivi- 3 sion 1 as amended by chapter 183 of the laws of 2024 and subdivision 8 4 as amended by chapter 267 of the laws of 1978, are amended to read as 5 follows: 6 a. Until December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, whenever in 7 its opinion the population of deer in any area of the state [except in 8 the northern zone] is such that additional harvest of deer is reasonably 9 necessary to properly manage the deer herd in the state in balance with 10 the available deer range and natural food supply, the department may 11 provide by regulation for issuance of deer management permits, permit- 12 ting the taking of one deer for the permit, in addition to the limit of 13 one deer that may otherwise be taken by one person in a license year. 14 8. [Except with respect to deer management unit thirty-four the 15 provision of this section shall not apply to the "Northern Zone" of the 16 state as defined in subdivision sixteen of section 11-0103 of this chap- 17 ter] The department is authorized and directed to promulgate any rules 18 or regulations necessary to more particularly describe areas of land set 19 forth in this section. 20 § 2. Subdivision 9 of section 11-0913 of the environmental conserva- 21 tion law is REPEALED. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15133-01-6